pl: Tkanina: Akryl; Angora; Bambus; Płótno; Wełna kaszmirska; Sztruks; Korek; Bawełna; Drelich; Sztuczne futro; Skaj; Filc; Flanela; Polar; Futrzany; Konopie; Juta; Lateks; Skórzane; Bielizna pościelowa; Lycra; Liocel; Wełna merynosów; Siatka; Modalny; Moher; Neopren; Nylon; Tworzywo sztuczne; Plusz; Poliester; Rattan; Rayon; Guma; Satyna; Szerpa; Jedwab; Zamsz; Syntetyczne; Frotte; Tweed; Diagonalna; Welur; Aksamit; Winyl; Wiskoza; Wełna; Pozostałe
de: Stoff: Acryl; Angora; Bambus; Leinwand; Kaschmir; Cord; Kork; Baumwolle; Denim; Kunstpelz; Kunstleder; Filz; Flanell; Vlies; Fell; Hanf; Jute; Latex; Leder; Leinen; Lycra; Lyocell; Merino; Netz; Modal; Mohair; Neopren; Nylon; Kunststoff; Plüsch; Polyester; Rattan; Kunstseide; Gummi; Seidenmatt; Sherpa; Seide; Wildleder; Synthetisch; Frottee; Tweed; Köper; Velours; Samt; Vinyl; Viskose; Wolle; Sonstiges
hu: Szövet: Akril; Angora; Bambusz; Vászon; Kasmír; Kordbársony; Parafa; Pamut; Farmer; Műszőrme; Műbőr; Filc; Flanel; Gyapjú; Szőrme; Kender; Juta; Latex; Bőr; Lenvászon; Lycra; Lyocell; Merinó; Háló; Modál; Moher; Neoprén; Nejlon; Műanyag; Plüss; Poliészter; Rattan; Műselyem; Gumi; Szatén; Sherpa; Selyem; Szarvasbőr; Szintetikus; Frottírszövet; Tweed gyapjúszövet; Twill; Velúr; Bársony; Vinil; Viszkóz; Gyapjú; Egyéb
zh-CN: 织物: 丙烯酸; 安哥拉; 竹子; 画布; 羊绒; 灯心绒; 软木; 棉布; 牛仔布; 人造毛皮; 人造皮革; 毛毡; 法兰绒; 羊毛; 毛皮围巾; 麻; 黄麻; 乳胶; 皮革; 亚麻; 莱卡; 莱赛尔纤维; 美利奴羊毛; 网状; 莫代尔; 马海毛; 氯丁橡胶; 尼龙; 塑料; 柔软; 聚酯纤维; 藤条; 人造丝; 橡胶; 缎; Sherpa; 丝绸; 小牛皮; 合成; 毛圈织物; 花呢; 斜纹布; 丝绒; 天鹅绒; 乙烯基贴纸; 纤维胶; 羊毛; 其他
nl: Stof: Acryl; Angora; Bamboe; Canvas; Kasjmier; Corduroy; Kurk; Katoen; Denim; Nepbont; Kunstleer; Vilt; Flanel; Fleece; Bont; Hennep; Jute; Latex; Leer; Linnen; Lycra; Lyocell; Merino; Gaas; Modal; Mohair; Neopreen; Nylon; Plastic; Pluche; Polyester; Rotan; Rayon; Rubber; Satijn; Sherpa; Zijde; Suède; Synthetisch; Badstof; Tweed; Keper; Velours; Fluweel; Vinyl; Viscose; Wol; Andere
tr: Kumaş: Akrilik; Angora; Bambu; Tuval; Kaşmir; Kadife; Mantar; Pamuk; Kot; Sahte kürk; Suni deri; Keçe; Flanel; Yapağı; Kürk; Kenevir; Jüt; Lateks; Deri; Keten; Likra; Liyosel; Merino; Ağ; Modal; Tiftik kumaş; Neopren; Plastik; Plastik; Peluş; Poliyester; Hint kamışı; Rayon; Kauçuk; Saten; Şerpa; İpek; Süet; Sentetik; Havlu kumaş; Tüvit; Dimi; Velur; Kadife; Vinil; Viskon; Yünlüler; Diğer
el: Ύφασμα: Ακρυλικό; Ανκορά; Μπαμπού; Καμβάς; Κασμίρι; Κοτλέ; Φελλός; Βαμβάκι; Ντένιμ; Συνθετική γούνα; Συνθετικό δέρμα; Τσόχα; Φανελένιο ύφασμα; Φλις; Γούνα; Καννάβι; Γιούτα; Λάτεξ; Δέρμα; Λινό; Λύκρα; Lyocell; Μαλλί μερινός; Πλέγμα; Μοντάλ; Μοχέρ; Νεοπρένιο; Νάιλον; Πλαστικό; Πλούσα; Πολυεστέρας; Ρατάν; Ρεγιόν; Καουτσούκ; Σατέν; Σέρπα; Μετάξι; Καστόρι; Συνθετικό; Πετσετέ ύφασμα; Τουίντ; Twill; Βελουτέ; Βελούδο; Βινύλιο; Βισκόζη; Μαλλί; Άλλο
ru: Ткань: Акрил; Ангора; Бамбук; Холщовая ткань; Кашемир; Вельвет; Пробка; Хлопок; Деним; Искусственный мех; Искусственная кожа; Фетр; Фланель; Флис; Мех; Конопля; Джут; Латекс; Кожа; Лен; Лайкра; Лиоцелл; Мериносовая шерсть; Сетка; Модал; Мохер; Неопрен; Нейлон; Пластик; Плюш; Полиэстер; Ротанг; Район; Резина; Сатин; Шерпа; Шелк; Замша; Синтетика; Махровая ткань; Твид; Твил; Велюр; Бархат; Винил; Вискоза; Шерсть; Другой
lt-LT: Audinys: Akrilas; Angora; Bambukas; Drobė; Kašmyras; Velvetas; Kamštiena; Medvilnė; Džinsinis audinys; Dirbtinis kailis; Dirbtinė oda; Veltinis; Flanelė; Flisas; Kailis; Kanapių pluoštas; Džiutas; Lateksas; Oda; Lininis audinys; Laikra; Liocelis; Merino vilna; Tinklelis; Modalas; Mohera; Neoprenas; Nailonas; Plastikas; Pliušas; Poliesteris; Ratanas; Viskozė; Kaučiukas; Satinas; Šerpa; Šilkas; Zomša; Sintetika; Frotinis audinys; Tvido audinys; Tvilas; Veliūras; Aksomas; Vinilas; Viskozė; Vilna; Kita
fr: Tissu: Acrylique; Angora; Bambou; Toiles; Cachemire; Corduroy; Liège; Coton; Jean; Fausse fourrure; Faux cuir; Feutre; Flanelle; Polaire; Fourrure; Chanvre; Jute; Latex; Cuir; Lin; Lycra; Lyocell; Mérinos; A mailles; Modal; Mohair; Néoprène; Nylon; Plastique; Rembourré; Polyester; Rattan; Rayon; Caoutchouc; Satiné; Sherpa; Soie; Suède; Synthétique; Torchon; Tweed; Twill; Velours; Velours; Vinyl; Viscose; Laine; Autre
ja: 布・生地: アクリル; アンゴラ; バンブー; キャンバス; カシミヤ; コーデュロイ; コルク; コットン; デニム; フェイクファー; フェイクレザー; フェルト; フランネル; フリース; 毛皮; 麻; ジュート; ラテックス; レザー; リネン; Lycra; リヨセル; メリノ; メッシュ; モーダル; モヘア; ネオプレン; ナイロン; プラスチック; プラッシュ; ポリエステル; 籐; レーヨン; ゴム; サテン; シェルパ; シルク; スエード; 合成品; テリークロス; ツイード; ツイル; ベロア; ベルベット; ビニール; ビスコース; ウール; その他
pt-BR: Tecido: Acrílico; Angora; Bambu; Tela; Caxemira; Veludo cotelê; Cortiça; Algodão; Jeans; Pele sintetica; Couro falso; Sentido; Flanela; Lã; Pele; Cânhamo; Juta; Látex; Couro; Linho; Lycra; Lyocell; Merino; Malha; Modal; Mohair; Neoprene; Nylon; Plástico; Pelúcia; Poliéster; Rattan; Rayon; Borracha; Cetim; Xerpa; Seda; Camurça; Sintético; Felpa; Tweed; Sarja; Veludo; Veludo; Vinil; Viscose; Lã; Outro
vi: Vải: Acrylic; Angora; Tre; Toan; Len cashmere; Vải nhung tăm; Thảm gỗ bần; Vải bông; Bò; Lông thú giả; Da giả; Nỉ; Nỉ mỏng; Nỉ cào; Lông thú; Cây gai dầu; Sợi đay; Mủ cao su; Da; Lanh; Lycra; Lyocell; Merino; Lưới; Phương thức; Len mohair; Neoprene; Nylon; Nhựa; Lông nhung; Polyester; Cây mây; Vải rayon; Cao su; Satin; Vải Sherpa; Lụa; Da lộn; Tổng hợp; Vải terry; Vải tuýt; Vải twill; Vải velour; Nhung; Nhựa vinyl; Vải viscose; Len; Khác
th: ผ้า: อะคริลิก; ขนกระต่ายแองโกร่า; ไผ่; ผ้าใบ; ขนแคชเมียร์; ผ้าลูกฟูก; ต้นคอร์ก; สำลี; ผ้าเดนิม; ขนเทียม; หนังเทียม; ผ้าสักหลาด; ผ้าสักหลาด; ผ้าขนแกะ; Fur; กัญชง; ใยปอ; ยางพารา; หนัง; ผ้าลินิน; ผ้าไลครา; ผ้าไลโอเซลล์; ขนแกะเมอริโน; ตาข่าย; ผ้าโมดาล; ขนโมแฮร์; นีโอพรีน; ไนลอน; พลาสติก; ขนนุ่ม; โพลีเอสเตอร์; หวาย; เรยอน; ยาง; กระดาษเนื้อซาติน; เชอร์ปา; ผ้าไหม; หนังกลับ; สังเคราะห์; ผ้าขนหนู; ผ้าทวีด; ผ้าทวิล; ผ้ากำมะหยี่; ผ้ากำมะหยี่; ไวนิล; เส้นใยเรยอน; ผ้าขนสัตว์; อื่นๆ
it: Tessuto: Acrilico; Angora; Bamboo; Tela; Cashmere; Velluto a coste; Sughero; Cotone; Denim; Pelliccia ecologica; Ecopelle; Feltro; Flanella; Felpa; Pelliccia; Canapa; Iuta; Lattice; Pelle; Lino; Lycra; Lyocell; Merino; Mesh; Modal; Mohair; Neoprene; Nylon; Plastica; Soffice; Poliestere; Rattan; Rayon; Gomma; Satinato; Sherpa; Seta; Pelle scamosciata; Sintetico; Tessuto di spugna; Tweed; Twill; Velour; Velluto; Vinile; Viscosa; Lana; Altro
da: Stof: Akryl; Angora; Bambus; Lærred; Kashmir; Corduroy; Kork; Bomuld; Denim; Kunstskind; Kunstigt læder; Filt; Flannel; Fleece; Pels; Hamp; Jute; Latex; Læder; Linned; Lycra; Lyocell; Merino; Mesh; Modal; Mohair; Neopren; Nylon; Plast; Plys; Polyester; Rattan; Rayon; Gummi; Satin; Sherpa; Silke; Ruskind; Syntetisk; Frotté; Tweed; Twill; Velour; Fløjl; Vinyl; Viskose; Uld; Andet
ro-RO: Țesătură: Acrilic; Angora; Bamboo; Pânză; Cașmir; Catifea cord; Plută; Bumbac; Denim; Blană artificială; Imitație de piele; Pâslă; Flanelă; Polar; Blană; Cânepă; Iută; Latex; Piele; In; Lycra; Lyocell; Merinos; Plasă; Modal; Mohair; Neopren; Nailon; Plastic; Pluș; Poliester; Ratan; Mătase artificială; Cauciuc; Satin; Sherpa; Mătase; Piele întoarsă; Sintetic; Tricot plușat; Tweed; Twill; Velour; Catifea; Vinil; Viscoză; Lână; Altele
sl-SI: Tkanina: Akril; Angora; Bambus; Platno; Kašmir; Rebrasti žamet; Pluta; Bombaž; Džins; Umetno krzno; Umetno usnje; Filc; Flanela; Flis; Krzno; Konoplja; Juta; Latex; Usnje; Lan; Lycra; Liocel; Merino; Mreža; Modal; Moher; Neopren; Najlon; Plastika; Pliš; Poliester; Ratan; Rajon; Guma; Saten; Šerpa; Svila; Semiš; Sintetika; Frotir; Tvid; Keper; Velur; Žamet; Vinil; Viskoza; Volna; Drugo
nb: Stoff: Akryl; Angora; Bambus; Lerret; Kasjmir; Kordfløyel; Kork; Bomull; Denim; Fuskepels; Kunstig lær; Filt; Flanell; Fleece; Pels; Hamp; Jute; Lateks; Skinn; Lin; Lycra; Lyocell; Merino; Mesh; Modal; Mohair; Neopren; Nylon; Plast; Plysj; Polyester; Rotting; Rayon; Gummi; Sateng; Sherpa; Silke; Semsket; Syntetisk; Frotté; Tweed; Twill; Velour; Fløyel; Vinyl; Viskose; Ull; Annen
bg-BG: Плат: Акрил; Ангора; Бамбук; Брезент; Кашмир; Велур; Корк; Памук; Деним; Изкуствена козина; Изкуствена кожа; Филц; Бархет; Полар; Козина; Коноп; Юта; Латекс; Кожа; Лен; Ликра; Лиоцел; Мерино; Мрежа; Модал; Мохер; Неопрен; Найлон; Пластмаса; Плюш; Полиестер; Ратан; Изкуствена коприна; Каучук; Сатен; Шерпа; Коприна; Набук; Синтетичен; Хавлиена кърпа; Туид; Кепър; Велур; Кадифе; Винил; Вискоза; Вълна; Други
sk-SK: Látka: Akryl; Angora; Bambus; Plátno; Kašmír; Menčester; Korok; Bavlna; Denim; Umelá kožušina; Umelá koža; Plsť; Flanel; Flís; Kožušina; Konope; Juta; Latex; Koža; Ľan; Lycra; Lyocell; Merino; Sieťovina; Modal; Mohér; Neoprén; Nylon; Plast; Plyš; Polyester; Ratan; Umelý hodváb Rayon; Guma; Satén; Sherpa; Hodváb; Semiš; Syntetický; Froté; Tvíd; Keper; Velúr; Zamat; Vinyl; Viskóza; Vlna; Iné
sv: Tyg: Akryl; Angora; Bambu; Kanvas; Kaschmir; Manchester; Kork; Bomull; Denim; Fuskpäls; Fuskläder; Filt; Flanell; Fleece; Päls; Hampa; Jute; Latex; Läder; Linne; Lykra; Lyocell; Merino; Mesh; Modal; Mohair; Neopren; Nylon; Plast; Plysch; Polyester; Rattan; Rayon; Gummi; Satin; Sherpa; Silke; Mocka; Syntetisk; Frotté; Tweed; Twill; Velour; Sammet; Vinyl; Viskos; Ylle; Annat
es: Tejido: Acrílico; Angora; Bambú; Lienzo; Cachemira; Pana; Corcho; Algodón; Vaquera; Piel sintética; Cuero sintético; Fieltro; Franela; Vellón; Piel; Cáñamo; Yute; Látex; Cuero; Lino; Licra; Lyocell; Lana merina; Malla; Modal; Mohair; Neopreno; Nylon; Plástico; Felpa; Poliéster; Ratán; Rayón; Goma; Satinado; Sherpa; Seda; Gamuzado; Sintético; Tela de toalla; Tweed; Sarga; Terciopelo; Terciopelo; Vinilo; Viscosa; Lana; Otros
cs: Tkanina: Akrylové; Angora; Bambus; Plátno; Kašmír; Manšestr; Korek; Bavlna; Džínovina; Nepravá kožešina; Nepravá kůže; Plst; Flanel; Flís; Srst; Konopí; Juta; Latex; Kůže; Len; Lycra; Lyocell; Merino; Síťovina; Modal; Mohér; Neoprén; Nylon; Plast; Plyšový; Polyester; Ratan; Umělé hedvábí; Guma; Satén; Šerpa; Hedvábí; Semiš; Syntetické; Froté; Tvíd; Kepr; Velur; Samet; Vinylové; Viskóza; Vlna; Jiné
ko: 패브릭: 아크릴; 앙고라; 대나무; 캔버스; 캐시미어; 코듀로이; 코르크; 면; 데님; 인조 모피; 인조 가죽; 펠트; 플란넬; 플리스; 모피; 대마; 주트; 라텍스; 가죽; 린넨; 라이크라; 리오셀; 메리노; 메쉬; 모달; 모헤어; 네오프렌; 나일론; 플라스틱; 푹신함; 폴리에스테르; 등나무; 레이온; 고무; 새틴; 셰르파; 실크; 스웨이드; 인조; 테리직물; 트위드; 능직; 벨루어; 벨벳; 비닐; 비스코스; 울; 기타
hr-HR: Tekstil: Akril; Angora; Bambus; Platno; Kašmir; Samt; Pluto; Pamuk; Traper; Umjetno krzno; Umjetna koža; Filc; Flanel; Flis; Krzno; Konoplja; Juta; Lateks; Koža; Lan; Likra; Liocel; Merino; Mrežica; Modal; Moher; Neopren; Najlon; Plastika; Pliš; Poliester; Ratan; Rajon; Guma; Saten; Šerpa; Svila; Antilop; Sintetika; Frotir; Tvid; Keper; Velur; Baršun; Vinil; Viskoza; Vuna; Ostalo
en: Fabric: Acrylic; Angora; Bamboo; Canvas; Cashmere; Corduroy; Cork; Cotton; Denim; Faux fur; Faux leather; Felt; Flannel; Fleece; Fur; Hemp; Jute; Latex; Leather; Linen; Lycra; Lyocell; Merino; Mesh; Modal; Mohair; Neoprene; Nylon; Plastic; Plush; Polyester; Rattan; Rayon; Rubber; Satin; Sherpa; Silk; Suede; Synthetic; Terrycloth; Tweed; Twill; Velour; Velvet; Vinyl; Viscose; Wool; Other
pt-PT: Tecido: Acrílico; Angorá; Bambu; Tela; Caxemira; Bombazina; Cortiça; Algodão; Ganga; Peles sintéticas; Couro falso; Feltro; Flanela; Velo; Pele; Cânhamo; Juta; Látex; Pele; Linho; Licra; Liocel; Merino; Rede; Modal; Mohair; Neoprene; Náilon; Plástico; Peluche; Poliéster; Ratim; Raiom; Borracha; Acetinado; Sherpa; Seda; Camurça; Sintético; Felpa; Tweed; Ligamento sarja; Aveludado; Veludo; Vinil; Viscose; Lã; Outro
fi: Kangas: Akryyli; Angora; Bambu; Kanvaasi; Kasmir; Corduroy; Korkki; Puuvilla; Denim; Tekoturkis; Keinonahka; Huopa; Flanneli; Fleece; Turkis; Hamppu; Juutti; Lateksi; Nahka; Pellava; Lycra; Lyocell; Merino; Verkko; Modaali; Mohair; Neopreeni; Nailon; Muovi; Pehmo; Polyesteri; Rottinki; Rayon; Kumi; Satiini; Sherpa; Silkki; Mokka; Synteettinen; Frotee; Tweed; Tvilli; Velour; Sametti; Vinyyli; Viskoosi; Villa; Muu
zh-TW: 布料: 壓克力; 安哥拉毛; 竹子; 帆布; 羊絨; 燈心絨; 軟木; 棉布; 牛仔布; 人造毛皮; 人造皮; 毛氈; 絨布; 刷毛布; 皮草; 大麻; 黃麻; 乳膠; 皮製; 亞麻; 萊卡; 萊賽爾纖維; 美利奴羊毛; 網布; 莫代爾; 馬海毛; 氯丁橡膠; 尼龍; 塑膠; 毛絨; 聚酯; 藤; 人造絲; 橡膠; 緞面布; 羊毛布; 絲綢; 麂皮; 合成; 毛圈布; 花呢; 斜紋布; 絲絨; 天鵝絨; 乙烯基; 黏膠; 羊毛; 其他